Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Chapter 2 Public Assistance and Social Services

Physician rendering emergency services entitled to recoverfrom county. —

Where one without means to pay for medical attendance was injured in a railroad accident, whereby emergency medical attendance was necessary in order to save his life, a physician who rendered such services was entitled to recover from county, though board of commissioners was not in session at the time and nothing showed that notice could have been given until after possibility of saving the life had passed. Board of Comm'rs v. Denebrink, 15 Wyo. 342, 89 P. 7,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1907) (decided under prior law).

But county not liable for care of nonresident. —

In action by Carbon county against Sweetwater county to recover for care of person who was found injured in the latter county, but who, for convenience, was taken to and cared for by plaintiff county, whence he could not safely be removed, defendant was not liable where evidence did not show that he was a pauper, nor that he was a resident of defendant county and trial court did not find that county board had notice. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 6 Wyo. 254, 44 P. 66,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1896) (decided under prior law).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d Abortion and Birth Control 61 to 64; 39 Am. Jur. 2d Health §§ 1 to 15; 70A Am. Jur. 2d Social Security and Medicare § 1 et seq.

Custody of children, consideration of investigation by welfare agency or the like in making or modifying award as between parents of, 35 ALR2d 629.

Alcoholic as entitled to public assistance under poor laws, 43 ALR3d 554.

Eligibility of strikers to obtain public assistance, 57 ALR3d 1303.

Validity of statutes or regulations denying welfare benefits to claimants who transfer property for less than its full value, 24 ALR4th 215.

Construction and application of Food Stamp Act of 1964 (7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.) establishing food stamp program, 13 ALR Fed 369.

Judicial review under 42 U.S.C. § 1316(a) (3-5) of determination by secretary of health, education and welfare that state public-assistance plan does not conform to federal requirements, 18 ALR Fed 831.

Liability of state or federal government for losses associated with distribution of food stamps, 116 ALR Fed 457.

Eligibility for food stamps under Food Stamp Act of 1964 (7 USCS §§ 2011 et seq.), 118 ALR Fed 473.

Violations and enforcement of Food Stamp Act of 1964 (7 USCS §§ 2011 et seq.), 120 ALR Fed 331.

81 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare § 1 et seq.